incubator/apertium-ovd.ovd.dix
<pardef n="est__n" c="strong, long">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emes</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>är</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- no pl.gen.ind -->
  <e>       <p><l>umes</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kull/a__n" c="weak, long">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/><s n="compound-only-R"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ų</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enes</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- no pl.gen.ind -->
  <e>       <p><l>umes</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="net__n" c="strong, short root vowel; dat only vowel balance in plural">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eð</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>į</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- no gen? -->

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- TODO nouns (anything assigned to these is probably wrong): -->

<pardef n="tunggel__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ra/kke__n">
  <e>       <p><l>kke</l>      <r>kke<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ttjin</l>      <r>kke<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="buo/k__n">
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>      <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tję</l>      <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e> <!--or acc?-->
</pardef>

<pardef n="gą̊s__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="by__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nn</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="war/g__n" c="wargen ietter Grobien
                        ig såg wardjin
                        ig djäv wardjem tjyöt
                        wardjemes bien ir åv">
  <e>       <p><l>g</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- <e>       <p><l>dje</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>djin</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dje</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>djem</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>djes</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>djemes</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="by"> <i>by</i> <par n="by__n"/></e>
<e lm="rakke" c="hund"> <i>ra</i> <par n="ra/kke__n"/></e>
<e lm="buok"> <i>buo</i> <par n="buo/k__n"/></e>
<e lm="kulla" c="jente"> <i>kull</i> <par n="kull/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="fera" c="ferje"> <i>fer</i> <par n="kull/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="wika" c="veke"> <i>wik</i> <par n="kull/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="gą̊s"> <i>gą̊s</i> <par n="gą̊s__n"/></e>
<e lm="maws"> <i>maws</i> <par n="gą̊s__n"/></e>
<e lm="net"> <i>net</i> <par n="net__n"/></e>
<e lm="åm"> <i>åm</i> <par n="net__n"/></e>
<e lm="est"> <i>est</i> <par n="est__n"/></e>
<e lm="ais" c="is"> <i>ais</i> <par n="est__n"/></e>
<e lm="tunggel" c="måne"> <i>tunggel</i> <par n="tunggel__n"/></e>
